California, session 20252026, AB2645.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 3 (commencing with Section 983) is added to Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code, to read: Article 3. Department of Motor Vehicles Mobile Services for Veterans983. (a) (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall coordinate with the Department of Veterans Affairs to provide mobile services at each California veterans veterans’ home at least one time per calendar year.(2) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall assist in coordinating the scheduling, space, and outreach to residents to facilitate the provision of services described in this section.(b) Mobile services provided pursuant to this section shall be made available to any veteran that is a resident of a veterans veterans’ home.(c) Mobile services provided pursuant to this section may include, but are not limited to, all both of the following:(1) Issuance or renewal of driver’s licenses and identification cards.(2)Vehicle registration services.(3)(2) Real ID application processing.(d) This section does not preclude the Department of Motor Vehicles from providing additional visits or services at a veterans veterans’ home when feasible.